Alabama, session 2026rs, HB594.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as
the Rural Industry Reshoring and Reinvestment Act.
Section 2. It is the intent of the Legislature to
attract manufacturing and supply chain investment to rural
Page 1

attract manufacturing and supply chain investment to rural
HB594 INTRODUCED
areas by offering targeted incentives and site development
support, with a focus on reshoring industries previously
located outside the United States.
Section 3. For the purpose of this act, the following
terms and phrases have the following meanings:
(1) DEPARTMENT. The Alabama Department of Commerce.
(2) ELIGIBLE BUSINESS. A manufacturing or logistics
company that locates and expands in a designated opportunity
zone.
(3) RURAL OPPORTUNITY ZONE. A county or jurisdiction
with a population below a threshold set by the Alabama
Department of Commerce and with economic indicators below the
state or national average.
Section 4. (a) A refundable income tax credit, known as
the Rural Reshoring Tax Credit is created.
(b) The income tax credit shall be made available to
eligible businesses that create at least 15 full-time jobs
with a median wage equal to or greater than the county median.
(c) The income tax credit is equal to five percent to
qualifying payroll for up to 10 years.
(d) The income tax credit is nontransferable and may be
carried forward for up to five years.
(e) The aggregate amount of income tax credits that may
be allocated by the department under this section during a
calendar year shall not exceed ten million dollars
($10,000,000).
(f)(1) The income tax credit allowed under this section
shall be effective beginning January 1, 2027, for the 2027 tax
Page 2

shall be effective beginning January 1, 2027, for the 2027 tax
HB594 INTRODUCED
year, and shall continue through the 2036 tax year.
(2) Notwithstanding the other provisions of this
subsection, a business shall not claim this income tax credit
for more than 10 tax years.
(3) A Supply Chain Localization Bonus of an additional
10 percent income tax credit on qualifying investment may be
claimed by businesses if the project replaces a previously
imported supply chain.
(4) The Alabama Department of Revenue may adopt rules
for the implementation and administration of this section.
Section 5. (a) The Industrial Site Development Grant
Fund is established and shall be administered by the
department to support infrastructure improvements at rural
industrial sites.
(b) Grant funds may be used for:
(1) Site grading;
(2) Roads;
(3) Utilities;
(4) Broadband; and
(5) Environmental permitting.
(c) The department shall award grants to local
governments, regional development authorities, or economic
development nonprofits.
Section 6. (a) The department shall award Job Creation
Performance Grants of three thousand dollars ($3,000) per
full-time job created in a rural opportunity zone to eligible
businesses.
(b) The aggregate amount of grants awarded pursuant to
Page 3

(b) The aggregate amount of grants awarded pursuant to
HB594 INTRODUCED
this section shall not exceed ten million dollars
($10,000,000) in a calendar year.
(c) The department, by rule, shall develop application
and oversight procedures.
Section 7. (a) The department shall designate Rural
Industry Opportunity Zones and shall maintain a list of
eligible rural areas based on population and economic
indicators.
(b) The department shall update Rural Industry
Opportunity Zones every three years.
Section 8. This act shall become effective on January
1, 2027.
Page 4